Hawaii statutes.
[§21F-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Committee" means the joint
legislative budget committee.

"House" means the state house of
representatives.

"Office" means the office of the
legislative analyst.

"Senate" means the state senate. [L
1990, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next